District of Columbia statutes.
34-731

Prosecution for violation of rules.

Prosecution for violation of any rule, order, or regulation issued, adopted, or approved by the Public Service Commission pursuant to this subtitle; § 50-2201.03(e), or Chapters 28 and 30 [repealed] of Title 47, shall be on information in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia, by the Corporation Counsel or any of his or her assistants. Any person, corporation, or public utility violating any rule, order, or regulation shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than $10,000. With respect to orders, rules, or regulations made or adopted by the Public Service Commission under authority of this subtitle, this section shall be construed to apply only to the orders, rules, or regulations subject to the penalties specifically provided in § 34-706.

History

Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 569, ch. 40, § 1
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207,§ 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-153, § 4(a), 31 DCR 6440
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-342, § 302, 52 DCR 2346

Cross References

Motor vehicles and traffic, rules and regulations, authority, see § 50-2201.03.
Public Service Commission, creation, powers and duties, see § 34-802.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-732 and § 34-1552.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-307.
1973 Ed., § 43-907.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-342 substituted “$10,000” for “$300”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 302 of Omnibus Utility Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-12, January 28, 2005, 52 DCR 2945).

References in Text

Chapter 30 of Title 47, referred to in the first sentence, was repealed by D.C. Law 5-136, effective March 13, 1985.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.